Washington statutes.
RCW 4.36.140

Answer in action to recover property distrained.

In an action to recover the possession of property distrained doing damage, an answer that the defendant or person by whose command he or she acted, was lawfully possessed of the real property upon which the distress was made, and that the property distrained was at the time doing the damage thereon, shall be good, without setting forth the title to such real property.

[ 2011 c 336 s 107; Code 1881 s 101; 1877 p 22 s 101; 1854 p 143 s 63; RRS s 295.]